Utah statutes.
54-7-26.   Violations by officers or agents of utility -- Penalty.

Every officer, agent, or employee of any public utility who violates or fails to comply with, or who procures, aids, or abets any violation by any public utility of any provision of the Constitution of this state or of this title, or who fails to obey, observe, or comply with any order, decision, direction, demand, or requirement, or any part or provision thereof, of the commission, or who procures, aids, or abets any public utility in its failure to obey, observe, and comply with any order, decision, direction, demand, or requirement, or any part or provision thereof, in a case in which a penalty has not been provided for, the officer, agent, or employee is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 305, 2008 General Session

